California, session 20252026, AB1866.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 8685.1 is added to the Government Code, to read:8685.1. The director, when determining an allocation of funds for a project consistent with this chapter, shall prioritize local agencies that are not eligible under the federal Robert T. Stafford Disaster Relief and Emergency Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 5121 et seq.) due to their inability to meet the minimum damages threshold set by Section 206.48 of Title 44 of the Code of Federal Regulations.SEC. 2. Section 8685.9 of the Government Code is amended to read:8685.9. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, including Section 8686, for any eligible project, the state share shall not exceed 75 percent of total state eligible costs unless the local agency is located within a city, county, or city and county that has adopted a local hazard mitigation plan in accordance with the federal Disaster Mitigation Act of 2000 (P.L. 106-390) as part of the safety element of its general plan adopted pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 65302. In that situation, the Legislature may provide for a state share of local costs that exceeds 75 percent of total state eligible costs.(b) Notwithstanding any other law, including Section 8686, for any eligible project, the local agency cost share may include, but is not limited to, the following:(1) Local agency personnel costs, equipment costs, and the cost of supplies and materials used during disaster response activities, incurred as a result of a state of emergency proclaimed by the Governor.(2) Costs to repair, restore, reconstruct, or replace facilities belonging to local agencies damaged as a result of disasters as defined in Section 8680.3, including mitigation measures performed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 8686.4.(3) Indirect administrative costs and any other assistance deemed necessary by the local agency.(4) A calculated level of compensation associated with volunteer services provided by individuals participating in emergency work activities, including, but not limited to, community emergency response teams as authorized under the federal Robert T. Stafford Disaster Relief and Emergency Assistance Act (commencing with Section 5121) of Title 42 of the United States Code.